California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 This fee shall not exceed the reasonable cost to the council of providing the hearing. Upon a favorable judgment for the council in any proceeding, the council shall be entitled to recover its reasonable attorney’s fees.

(g) This section governs only the procedures for application denial or registrant discipline and not the substantive grounds therefor. An application denial or registrant discipline based upon substantive grounds that violates contractual or other rights of the applicant or registrant or is otherwise unlawful is not made valid by compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 660, Sec. 8.   (SB 484)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22253.5.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2020, as a condition of registration, the council shall require the applicant to submit fingerprint images as directed by the council and in a form consistent with the requirements of this section.

(b) The council shall submit the fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and nature of a record of state-level convictions and of state-level arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the applicant was released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide information to the council pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The council shall request subsequent arrest notification service from the Department of Justice, as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for all applicants for registration for whom fingerprint images and related information are submitted to conduct a search for state-level criminal offender record information.

(e) The council may receive arrest notifications and other background materials about applicants and registrants from a city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 4.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22254.

A provider of tax preparer education for tax preparers shall meet standards and procedures as approved by the council. The council shall either approve or decline to approve providers of tax preparer education within 120 days of receiving a request for approval. If approval is not declined within 120 days, the provider shall be deemed approved. A listing of those providers approved by the council shall be made available to tax preparers upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 67.4.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22255.

(a) The council shall issue a “certificate of completion,” as part of the education registration requirements described in Section 22251.3, to the tax preparer when the tax preparer demonstrates that he or she has (1) completed not less than 60 hours of instruction in basic personal income tax law, theory, and practice by an approved curriculum provider within the previous 18 months; and (2) provides evidence of compliance with the bonding requirement of Section 22250.1, including the name of the surety company, the bond number, and the bond expiration date. Of the required 60 hours, 45 hours shall be concerned with federal tax curriculum and 15 hours shall be concerned with state tax curriculum.

(b) A tax preparer shall complete on an annual basis not less than 20 hours of continuing education, including 15 hours in federal taxation and 5 hours in California taxation from an approved curriculum provider. The council shall issue annually a “statement of compliance” when the tax preparer demonstrates that he or she has (1) completed the required 20 hours of continuing education, and (2) provides evidence of compliance with the bonding requirement of Section 22250.1, including the name of the surety company, the bond number, and the bond expiration date.

(c) An individual who possesses a minimum of two recent years’ experience in the preparation of personal income tax returns may petition the council to review the experience and determine if it is the equivalent of the required qualifying education described in subdivision
 (a). The council may provide that individual with a “certificate of completion” if it is determined that the experience is the equivalent of the required hours. Tax preparation performed in situations that violate this chapter, by an individual who is neither registered nor exempted, may not be used toward the qualifying experience needed for registration as a tax preparer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 11.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22256.

(a) The superior court in and for the county in which any person acts as a tax preparer in violation of the provisions of this chapter, may, upon a petition by any person, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining the conduct. The proceedings under this paragraph shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Except as provided in paragraphs (12) to (18), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 22253, a person who violates a provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, which offense is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for
 not more than one year, or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 12.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22257.

(a) If a tax preparer fails to perform a duty specifically imposed upon him or her pursuant to this chapter, any person may maintain an action for enforcement of those duties or to recover a civil penalty in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or for both enforcement and recovery.

(b) In an action to enforce these duties or to recover civil penalties, or for both enforcement and recovery, the prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, in addition to the civil penalties provided under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 54 of Ch. 1137.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22258.

(a) The following persons are exempt from the requirements of this title, subject to the requirements of subdivision (b):

(1) An individual with a current and valid license issued by the California Board of Accountancy, or authorized to practice public accountancy pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 5096) of
 Chapter 1 of Division 3.

(2) A firm, including the firm’s partners, shareholders, owners, or employees, provided the firm has a current and valid license issued by the California Board of Accountancy.

(3) A person who is an active member of the State Bar of California.

(4) Any trust company or trust business as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 99) of Division 1 of the Financial Code.

(5) A financial institution regulated by the state or federal government, insofar as the activities of the financial institution with respect to tax preparation are subject to federal or state examination or oversight.

(6) A person who is enrolled to practice before the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to Subpart A (commencing with Section 10.1) of Part 10 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(7) Any employee of any person described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6), while functioning within the scope of that employment, insofar that the employee is supervised by a person exempt under this subdivision who reviews the return, signs it, and is responsible for its content.

(8) Any employee of any corporation, partnership, association, or any entity described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22251.

(b) (1) Except for employees of entities described in paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (a), paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) shall apply only if all tax returns prepared by that employee are signed by a person described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (6) of subdivision (a).

(2) Paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) shall apply only if all tax returns prepared by that employee are signed by the person described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a).

(3) No person described in this
 subdivision as an employee may sign a tax return, unless that employee is otherwise exempt under this section, is registered as a tax preparer with the council, or is an employee of either a trust company or trust business described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or any employee of a financial institution described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section, preparation of a tax return includes the inputting of tax data into a computer.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to tax returns prepared for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 329, Sec. 1.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22259.

(a) This chapter shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(b) This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 185, Sec. 1.   (SB 812)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 14, commencing with Section 22250.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Passage Tickets [22300. - 22304.]

22300.

No person issuing, selling or offering to sell any passage ticket or any instrument giving or purporting to give any right, either absolutely or upon any condition or contingency, to a passage or conveyance upon any vessel, or a berth or stateroom in any vessel, shall hold himself out to be or advertise himself in any way as the agent of the owner or consignees of such vessel or line, unless he has received authority in writing therefor, specifying the name of the company, line or vessel for which he is authorized to act as agent and the city or other place, together with the street and the street number, in which his office is kept for the sale of tickets, and unless such written authorization is readily available in such office.

This section shall not apply to the sale of passage tickets on board any such vessel or to the offices of the actual owners or consignees of such vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

22301.

No person issuing, selling or offering to sell or holding himself out as being authorized to sell any such passage ticket or instrument giving or purporting to give any such right to passage or conveyance shall give or cause to be given any false or misleading information or shall print, publish, distribute or circulate or cause to be printed, published, distributed or circulated any false or misleading advertisement, circular, circular letter, pamphlet, card, handbill or other printed paper or notice in regard to the passage, ticket or instrument or the passage or voyage to which it entitles or purports to entitle its owner, purchaser or holder or line over which, or the vessel for which such passage is sold or offered or as to his agency for such line or vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

22302.

Any person issuing, selling, or offering to sell any passenger ticket for passage or conveyance aboard any foreign vessel, including the owner or consignee of such vessel, his agents, servants, or employees, shall make reference to the country of registry of such vessel and a statement that such vessel is not subject to American safety regulations in any advertisement, circular, circular letter, pamphlet, card, handbill, or other printed paper or notice, written or oral, in regard to the passage, ticket, or instrument, or the passage or voyage to which it entitles or purports to entitle its owner, purchaser, or holder, or line over which, or the vessel for which, such passage is sold or offered, or as to his agency for such line or vessel. The reference and statement shall be prominently displayed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

22303.

A ticket or instrument issued as evidence of a right of passage upon the high seas, from any port in this state, to any port of any other state or nation, and every certificate or order issued for the purpose, or under pretense of procuring any such ticket or instrument, and every receipt for money paid for such ticket or instrument shall state the name of the vessel on board of which the passage is to be made, the name of the owners or consignees of such vessel, the name of the company, or line, if any, to which such vessel belongs, its country of registry, the place from which such passage is to commence, the place where such passage is to terminate, the day of the month and year upon which the voyage is to commence, the name of the person purchasing such ticket or instrument, or receiving such order, certificate or receipt, and the amount paid therefor; and such ticket or instrument, order, certificate or receipt, unless sold or issued by the owners or consignees of such vessel, shall be signed by their authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

22304.

Any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association or any employee or agent thereof who violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 16. Process Servers [22350. - 22360.]

22350.

(a) Any natural person who makes more than 10 services of process within this state during one calendar year, for specific compensation or in expectation of specific compensation, where that compensation is directly attributable to the service of process, shall file and maintain a verified certificate of registration as a process server with the county clerk of the county in which he or she resides or has his or her principal place of business. Any corporation or partnership that derives or expects to derive compensation from service of process within this state shall also file and maintain a verified certificate of registration as a process server with the county clerk of the county in which the corporation or partnership has its principal place of business.

(b) This chapter shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any sheriff, marshal, or government employee who is acting within the course and scope of his or her employment.

(2) An attorney or his or her employees, when serving process related to cases for which the attorney is providing legal services.

(3) Any person who is specially appointed by a court to serve its process.

(4) A licensed private investigator or his or her employees.

(5) A professional photocopier registered under Section 22450, or an employee thereof, whose only service of process relates to subpoenas for the production of records, which subpoenas specify that the records be copied by that registered professional photocopier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22351.

(a) The certificate of registration of a registrant who is a natural person shall contain the following:

(1) The name, age, address, email address, and telephone number of the registrant.

(2) A statement, signed by the registrant under penalty of perjury, that the registrant has not been convicted of a felony, or, if the registrant has been convicted of a felony, a copy of a certificate of rehabilitation, expungement, or pardon.

(3) A statement that the registrant has been a resident of this state for a period of one year
 immediately preceding the filing of the certificate.

(4) A statement that the registrant will perform their duties as a process server in compliance with the provisions of law governing the service of process in this state.

(b) The certificate of registration of a registrant who is a partnership or corporation shall contain the following:

(1) The names, ages, addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers of the general partners or officers.

(2) A statement, signed by the general partners or officers under penalty of perjury, that the general partners or officers have not been convicted of a felony.

(3) A
 statement that the partnership or corporation has been organized and existing continuously for a period of one year immediately preceding the filing of the certificate or a responsible managing employee, partner, or officer has been previously registered under this chapter.

(4) A statement that the partnership or corporation will perform its duties as a process server in compliance with the provisions of law governing the service of process in this state.

(c) The county clerk shall retain the certificate of registration for a period of three years following the expiration date of the
 certificate, after which time the certificate may be destroyed if it is scanned or if the conditions specified in Section 26205.1 of the Government Code are met. If the certificate is scanned, the scanned image shall be retained for a period of 10 years, after which time that image may be destroyed and, notwithstanding Section 26205.1 of the Government Code, no reproduction thereof need be made or preserved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 35.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22351.5.

(a) At the time of filing an initial certificate of registration or renewing a certificate of registration that has lapsed, the registrant shall also submit a completed Request for Live Scan form confirming fingerprint submission to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, in order to verify that the registrant has not been convicted of a felony. The clerk shall utilize the Subsequent Arrest Notification Contract provided by the Department of Justice for notifications subsequent to the initial certificate of registration.

(b) If, after receiving the results of the Request for Live Scan, the clerk is advised that the registrant has been convicted of a felony, the presiding judge of the superior
 court of the county in which the certificate of registration is maintained is authorized to review the criminal record and, unless the registrant is able to produce a copy of a certificate of rehabilitation, expungement, or pardon, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 22351, notify the registrant that the registration is revoked. An order to show cause for contempt may be issued and served upon any person who fails to surrender a registered process server identification card after a notice of revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.   (AB 1123)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22352.

At the time of filing the initial certificate of registration, a registrant shall pay the following fees to the county clerk:

(a) A fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) A fee to cover the actual costs of processing the completed request for live scan when submitted with the initial certificate of registration.

(c) A fee to cover the actual cost of issuing a registered process server identification card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 72.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22353.

(a) A certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a bond of two thousand dollars ($2,000), executed by an admitted surety insurer and conditioned upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all laws governing the service of process in this state. The total aggregate liability on the bond is limited to two thousand dollars ($2,000). As an alternative to the bond, the registrant may deposit with the clerk, cash or a money order in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(b) The county clerk shall, upon filing the bond, deliver the bond forthwith to the county recorder for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code shall be paid by the registered process server. The fee may be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the recorder.

(c) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is seven dollars ($7).

(d) The county recorder shall record the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond, and shall thereafter mail the instrument, unless specified to the contrary, to the person named in the instrument and, if no person is named, to the party leaving it for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code for the notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond shall be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the county recorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22354.

A certificate of registration shall be effective for a period of two years or until the date the bond expires, whichever occurs first. Thereafter, a registrant shall file a new certificate of registration or a renewal of the certificate of registration and pay the fee required by Section 22352. A certificate of registration may be renewed up to 60 days prior to its expiration date and the effective date of the renewal shall be the date the current registration expires. The renewal shall be effective for a period of two years from the effective date or until the expiration date of the bond, whichever occurs first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 35, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

22355.

(a) The county clerk shall maintain a register of process servers and assign a number and issue an identification card to each process server. The county clerk shall issue a temporary identification card, for no additional fee, to applicants who are required to submit Request for Live Scan forms for background checks to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Department of Justice. This card shall be valid for 120 days. If clearance is received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Department of Justice within 120 days, the county clerk shall immediately issue a permanent identification card to the applicant. Upon request of the applicant, the permanent identification card shall be mailed to the applicant at the applicant’s address of record. Upon renewal of a certificate of registration, the same number shall be
 assigned, provided that the applicant is renewing registration in the same county in which the applicant was previously registered and there is no lapse of three or more years in the period of registration.

(b) The temporary and permanent identification cards shall be not less than 314 inches by 2 inches and shall contain at the top the title, “Registered Process Server,” followed by the registrant’s name, address, registration number, date of expiration, and county of registration. In the case of a natural person, it shall also contain a photograph of the registrant in the lower left corner. The identification card for a partnership or corporation registration shall be issued in the name of the partnership or corporation, and shall not contain a photograph.

(c) This section shall
 remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 2.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

22355.

(a) The county clerk shall maintain a publicly available register of process servers and assign a number and issue an identification card to each process server. The county clerk shall issue a temporary identification card, for no additional fee, to applicants who are required to submit Request for Live Scan forms for background checks to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Department of Justice. This card shall be valid for 120 days. If clearance is received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Department of Justice within 120 days, the county clerk shall immediately issue a permanent identification card to the applicant. Upon request of the applicant, the permanent identification card shall be mailed to the applicant at the applicant’s address of record. Upon renewal of a certificate of
 registration, the same number shall be assigned, provided that the applicant is renewing registration in the same county in which the applicant was previously registered and there is no lapse of three or more years in the period of registration.

(b) The temporary and permanent identification cards shall be not less than 314 inches by 2 inches and shall contain at the top the title, “Registered Process Server,” followed by the registrant’s name, address, registration number, date of expiration, and county of registration. In the case of a natural person, it shall also contain a photograph of the registrant in the lower left corner. The identification card for a partnership or corporation registration shall be issued in the name of the partnership or corporation, and shall not contain a photograph.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 3.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22356.

A registrant shall be responsible at all times for the good conduct of his or her employees acting within the course or scope of their employment, and any person acting as an independent contractor within the course or scope of the agency relationship with the registrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 598, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

22356.5.

(a) In addition to the information required by subdivision (b) of Section 22360, any proof of service of any process which is signed by an independent contractor of a registrant under this chapter shall indicate that the proof of service was signed as an independent contractor of a registered process server. The proof of service shall indicate the county of registration and the number assigned pursuant to Section 22355 of both the independent contractor and the entity registered under this chapter.

(b) No registrant shall permit any individual to sign any proof of service of any process as an independent contractor unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The independent contractor is performing pursuant to a written independent contractor agreement with the registrant.

(2) The independent contractor supplies proof of bonding under Section 22353, if applicable. 

(3) The registrant exercises minimal supervision or control over the means of accomplishing the service of any process assigned by the registrant. The registrant may communicate a deadline for the service of process and request notification that such service has been completed.

(4) The registrant imposes no restrictions on the independent contractor’s ability to perform services for others registered under this chapter.

(5) The independent contractor supplies proof that any required business licenses have been obtained.

(c) Persons not meeting the criteria of subdivision (b) shall be treated as employees of the registrant while persons meeting the criteria of subdivision (b) shall be treated as independent contractors.

(d) This section shall not preclude an independent determination of employment under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 442, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22357.

(a) Any person who recovers damages in any action or proceeding for injuries caused by a service of process which was made by a registrant and did not comply with the provisions of law governing the service of process in this state may recover the amount of the damages from the bond required by Section 22353.

(b) Whenever there has been a recovery against a bond under subdivision (a), the registrant shall file a new bond or cash deposit within 30 days to reinstate the bond or cash deposit to the amount required by Section 22353. If the registrant does not file the bond within 30 days, the certificate of registration shall be revoked and the remainder of the bond forfeited to the county treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 892, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.

(a) A certificate of registration may be revoked or suspended whenever it has been determined that the registrant has made a service of process, including service completed by an employee or independent contractor of the registrant, which does not comply with the provisions of law governing the service of process in this state or constitutes an improper service of process not amounting to a violation of law. 

(b) An investigation concerning the revocation or suspension of a certificate of registration may be commenced at any time at the option of the county clerk if the county clerk deems it to be appropriate. A complaint by any person who has alleged that he or she has been injured by a service of process shall be investigated by the public prosecutor. The investigation shall determine if the registrant complied with the provisions of law governing the service of process or constituted improper service of process not amounting to a violation of the law. 

(c) If the public prosecutor determines from the investigation that cause may exist for the suspension or revocation of the certificate of registration, he or she shall set the matter for hearing and give notice to the registrant. That hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code except that the decision of the administrative law judge shall be final. For the purposes of those provisions, the public prosecutor shall be deemed to be the agency. 

(d) If, after the hearing, the county clerk is notified after the decision has become effective that the administrative law judge has directed that the registrant’s certificate be suspended or revoked, the county clerk shall forthwith suspend or revoke the certificate. If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit required by Section 22353 shall be forfeited to the county treasury subject to the right of a person to recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 22357.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 598, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

22359.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1661.)
-------------------------------------------

22360.

Any proof of service of any process which is signed by a registrant under this chapter shall indicate the county in which he or she is registered and the number assigned to him or her by Section 22355.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 442, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 17. Invention Development Services Contracts [22370. - 22395.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [22370. - 22371.]

22370.

(a) The Legislature finds that there are in the State of California members of the general public who have ideas or inventions that they believe have substantial commercial value but which members of the general public do not have the resources or expertise necessary to develop, manufacture or market these ideas or inventions; that these members of the general public are commonly referred to as “inventors”; that these inventors are generally not people who earn their livelihood from developing, manufacturing, promoting or marketing ideas or inventions, from manufacturing or marketing products, from publishing literary works or from owning, operating or
 controlling commercial enterprises; that there is a significant number of persons who have realized that inventors are willing to expend substantial sums for services represented to result in the development, manufacture, promotion, sale or general exploitation of the commercial value of their ideas or inventions; that these persons are frequently known as invention developers; that the invention developers’ services are generally offered for sums ranging from $500 to $5,000 plus either a percentage of the income that may be derived from the sale or marketing of the idea or invention or a partial ownership interest in the idea or invention; that the inventors generally have a very passive role in the development, promotion, manufacture or sale of their ideas or inventions after the contract with the invention developer is executed, usually doing little more than receiving periodic reports from the invention developer; that an extremely small number of inventors to whom these invention developers offer their
 services ever have their products sold or marketed; that there exists in connection with invention development services, sales practices and business methods which have worked a fraud, deceit, imposition, and financial hardship upon many people of this state; that existing legal protection to consumers is inadequate to prevent these abuses; that the invention development industry has a significant impact upon the economy and well-being of this state and its local communities; and that the provisions of this chapter relating to such services are necessary for the public welfare.

(b) The Legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is to safeguard the public against fraud, deceit, imposition, and financial hardship, and to foster and encourage competition, fair dealing, and prosperity in the field of invention development services by prohibiting or restricting false or misleading advertising, onerous contract terms, harmful financial
 practices, and other unfair, dishonest, deceptive, destructive, unscrupulous, fraudulent, and discriminatory practices by which the public has been injured in connection with invention development services but not to interfere with, or further regulate by this chapter, those persons who provide researching, marketing, surveying, or other kinds of consulting services to professional manufacturers, marketers, publishers or others purchasing such services as an adjunct to the traditional commercial enterprises in which they engage as a livelihood.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22371.

As used in this chapter, the following words have the following meanings:

(a) “Contract for invention development services” shall include a contract by which an invention developer undertakes to develop or promote an invention for a customer.

(b) “Customer” shall include any person, firm, corporation, or other entity that is solicited by, inquires about or seeks the services of, or enters into a contract for invention development services with an invention developer, except (1) any department or agency of the federal, state, or local government, (2)
 any charitable, scientific, educational, religious, or other organization qualified under Section 501(c)(3) or described in Section 170(b)(1)(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, and (3) any person, firm, corporation, or other entity regularly engaged in a trade, business, or profession which has either a net worth of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more or gross receipts from any source of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more during the calendar year in which any contract for invention development services is signed.

(c) “Invention” shall mean (1) an invention, (2) an idea, (3) a concept, or (4) any combination thereof.

(d) “Invention developer” shall mean any person, firm, corporation, or association, and the agents, employees, or representatives of such person, firm, corporation, or association that develops or promotes or offers to develop or
 promote an invention, except (1) any department or agency of the federal, state, or local government, (2) any charitable, scientific, educational, religious, or other organization qualified under Section 501(c)(3) or described in Section 170(b)(1)(a) of the Internal Revenue of Code of 1954, as amended, (3) any person, firm, corporation, association, or other entity whose gross receipts from contracts for invention development services, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 22371, do not exceed 10 percent of its gross receipts from all sources during the fiscal year preceding the year in which any contract for invention development services is signed, or (4) any person, firm, corporation, association or other entity that does not charge a fee for invention development services. For the purposes of this paragraph, “fee” shall include any payment made by the customer to such entity including reimbursements for expenditures made or costs incurred by such entity but shall not include any payment made from a
 portion of the income received by a customer by virtue of invention development services performed by such entity.

(e) “Invention development services” shall include acts required or promised to be performed, or actually performed, or both, by an invention developer for a customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Regulatory Provisions [22372. - 22378.]

22372.

(a) Every contract for invention development services shall be in writing and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter. A copy of the written contract shall be given to the customer at the time he signs the contract.

(b) If one or more subsequent contracts are contemplated by the invention developer in connection with an invention, or if the invention developer contemplates performance of services in connection with an invention in more than one phase with the performance of each phase covered in one or more subsequent contracts, the invention developer shall so state in a writing
 and shall supply to the customer such writing together with a copy of such contract or a written summary of the general terms of each and every such subsequent contract, including the amount of any fees or other consideration required from the customer, at the time the customer signs the first contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22373.
